Hawaii statutes.
§286-239
Commercial driver's license. (a) Commercial driver's licenses may be
issued with the following categories:

(1) Category A – Any combination of vehicles with a
gross combination weight rating of twenty-six thousand one pounds or more;
provided that the gross vehicle weight rating of the vehicles being towed is in
excess of ten thousand pounds;

(2) Category B – Any single vehicle with a gross
vehicle weight rating of twenty-six thousand one pounds or more, or any such
vehicle towing a vehicle not in excess of ten thousand pounds; and

(3) Category C – Any single vehicle or combination of
vehicles that meets neither the definition of category A nor that of category
B, but that is either:

(A) Designed to transport sixteen or more
passengers, including the driver; or

(B) Used in the transportation
of hazardous materials which requires the vehicle to comply with title 49 Code
of Federal Regulations part 172, subpart F.

(b) Commercial
drivers' licenses may be issued with any one or more of the following
endorsements and restrictions:

(1) "H" – Authorizes the driver to drive a
vehicle transporting hazardous materials;

(2) "L" – Restricts the driver to vehicles
not equipped with air brakes;

(3) "T" – Authorizes driving double and
triple trailers;

(4) "P" – Authorizes driving vehicles
carrying passengers;

(5) "N" – Authorizes driving tank vehicles;

(6) "X" – Represents a combination of
hazardous materials and tank vehicle endorsements;

(7) "S" – Authorizes driving school buses;

(8) "V" – Indicates there is information
about a medical variance on the commercial driver's license information system
driver record;

(9) "K" – Restricts the driver from
operating in interstate commerce as defined in title 49 Code of Federal
Regulations section 390.5;

(10) "Z" – Restricts the driver to vehicles
not equipped with full air brakes;

(11) "E" – Restricts the driver to vehicles
not equipped with any manual transmission;

(12) "O" – Restricts the driver to
non-tractor trailer commercial motor vehicles;

(13) "M" – Restricts the driver from
operating a class A passenger vehicle; and

(14) "N" – Restricts the driver from
operating a class A and B passenger vehicle.

(c) The holder of a
valid commercial driver's license may drive all vehicles in the category for
which the license is issued, and all lesser categories of vehicles except
motorcycles and except vehicles which require an endorsement, unless the proper
endorsement appears on the license.

(d) Before issuing
a commercial driver's license, the examiner of drivers shall complete a check
of the applicant's driving record to determine whether the applicant is subject
to any disqualification under section 286-240, or any license suspension,
revocation, or cancellation under state law, and whether the applicant has a
driver's license from more than one state or jurisdiction. The record check
shall be made no earlier than twenty-four hours prior to the initial issuance
or transfer and no sooner than ten days before renewals and upgrades of a
commercial driver's license. The record check shall include but is not limited
to the following:

(1) A check of the applicant's driving record as
maintained by the applicant's state of licensure;

(2) A check with the commercial driver's license
information system;

(3) A check with the National Driver Register; and

(4) A request for the applicant's complete driving
record from all states where the applicant was previously licensed to drive any
motor vehicle over the last ten years. This check is only required for drivers
renewing a commercial driver's license for the first time after September 30,
2002; provided that a notation is made on the driver's record confirming the
check has been made and the date it was done.

(e) Within ten days
after issuing a commercial driver's license, the examiner of drivers, in the
following situations, shall provide the operator of the commercial driver's
license information system with all information obtained by the examiner that
is necessary to identify the licensee:

(1) The issuance of each commercial driver's license;

(2) The notation of any changes in driver
identification information; and

(3) The notation of any changes to the driver's
driving record relating to the transfer of a commercial driver's license from
one state to another.

(f) Commercial
driver's licenses shall expire as follows:

(1) An initial or renewed commercial driver's license
with a hazardous materials endorsement shall expire no later than five years
from its date of issuance, except if the licensee is seventy-two years of age
or older. The expiration date of a commercial driver's license with a
hazardous materials endorsement shall be the same expiration date as the
hazardous materials endorsement. If the licensee is seventy-two years of age
or older, the initial or renewed commercial driver's license with a hazardous
materials endorsement shall not exceed two years; and

(2) All other initial commercial driver's licenses
shall be valid for not more than an eight-year period, expiring on the driver's
birthday. All other renewed licenses shall be valid for not more than an
eight-year period from the expiration date of the previous valid license. With
the exception of a commercial driver's license with a hazardous materials
endorsement, the commercial driver's license shall expire on the next birthday
of the licensee occurring not more than eight years after the date of issuance
of the license unless sooner revoked, suspended, or canceled; provided that,
unless sooner revoked, suspended, or canceled, the license shall expire on the
second birthday of the licensee following the issuance of the license if at
that time the licensee is seventy-two years of age or older.

(g) When applying
for renewal of a commercial driver's license, the applicant shall complete the
required application form and provide updated information and required
certifications. If the applicant desires to retain a hazardous materials
endorsement, the knowledge test for a hazardous materials endorsement shall
also be taken and passed by the applicant. The examiner of drivers shall
complete a check of the applicant's driving record as required under subsection
(d). [L 1989, c 320, pt of §2; am L 1990, c 342, §9; am L 1995, c 114, §3; am L
1998, c 93, §2; am L 2003, c 15, §1; am L 2004, c 103, §7; am L 2006, c 23, §1
and c 130, §5; am L 2010, c 83, §1; am L 2011, c 121, §3; am L 2013, c 114, §9;
am L 2014, c 72, §4]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next